Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 3. Certification of Mineral Mine Workers.

§ 45.2-1113.
Records of Board of Mineral Mining Examiners.

The Director of the Division shall preserve in his office a record of the meetings and transactions of the Board of Mineral Mining Examiners and of all certificates issued by the Board.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:17; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1114.
Certification of certain persons employed in mineral mines; powers of the Department.

The Department may require certification of each person who works in a mineral mine or whose duties and responsibilities in relation to mineral mining require competency, skill, or knowledge in order to perform the tasks required of him in a manner consistent with the preservation of the health and safety of persons and property. Each of the following certificates shall be issued by the Department, and a person who holds such a certificate is authorized to perform the tasks that the Act requires to be performed by such certified person:

Surface foreman;

Surface foreman open pit;

Underground foreman;

Surface blaster;

Electrical repairman;

Underground mining blaster;

General mineral miner; and

Mine inspector.

Certification shall also be required for any additional tasks that the Department requires by regulation.

The Department may adopt regulations necessary or incidental to the performance of duties or the execution of powers conferred under this title. Such regulations shall be adopted in accordance with the provisions of Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:19; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 50 provides: “That the Certification Requirements for Mineral Miners (4 VAC 25-35 et seq.) shall remain in full force and effect until updated regulations are adopted by the Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-1115.
Examinations required for Mineral Mining Certifications.

The Department may require the examination of each applicant for certification. The Department shall require the examination of each applicant for a mine inspector certification. The Department may require such other information from an applicant as necessary to ascertain competency and qualifications for each task.

Except as provided by the Act for a general mineral miner or surface foreman certification, the Department shall prescribe the qualifications for each type of certification. The examinations shall be conducted under conditions and regulations that the Department establishes or adopts. Such established conditions and adopted regulations shall be made a part of the permanent record of the Department, published periodically, and applied uniformly to all applicants.

Any certificate issued by the Department, except the general mineral miner certificate, shall be valid from the date of issuance for a period of five years unless renewed or unless revoked pursuant to §

45.2-1120

. The general mineral miner certificate shall be valid from the date of issuance until it is revoked pursuant to §

45.2-1120

.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:20; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 50 provides: “That the Certification Requirements for Mineral Miners (4 VAC 25-35 et seq.) shall remain in full force and effect until updated regulations are adopted by the Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-1116.
Performance of certain tasks by uncertified persons; penalty.

It is unlawful for any person to perform any task requiring Department certification unless he has been certified. It is unlawful for an operator or his agent to permit any uncertified person to perform such task. A violation of this section constitutes a Class 1 misdemeanor. Each day of operation without a required certification constitutes a separate offense. A certificate issued by the Board of Mineral Mining Examiners prior to July 1, 2012, shall be acceptable as a certificate issued by the Department until the Department provides otherwise by appropriate regulations.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:21; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 50 provides: “That the Certification Requirements for Mineral Miners (4 VAC 25-35 et seq.) shall remain in full force and effect until updated regulations are adopted by the Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-1117.
Examination fees; Mineral Mining Examiners’ Fund.

A fee of $10 shall be paid to the Director by each person examined before the commencement of the examination.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Mineral Mining Examiners’ Fund, referred to in this section as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All fees collected pursuant to subsection A, together with moneys collected pursuant to §

45.2-1119

, shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund.

The Fund shall be administered by the Director, and moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes of payment of the cost of printing certificates and other necessary forms and the incidental expenses incurred by the Department in conducting examinations, reviewing examination papers, and conducting its other duties pursuant to this article. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Director. The Director shall keep accounts and records concerning the receipts and expenditures of the Fund as required by the Auditor of Public Accounts.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:22; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 50 provides: “That the Certification Requirements for Mineral Miners (4 VAC 25-35 et seq.) shall remain in full force and effect until updated regulations are adopted by the Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-1118.
Reciprocal acceptance of other certifications.

In lieu of conducting an examination prescribed by law or regulation, the Department may issue to any person holding a certificate issued by another state a certificate permitting him to perform similar tasks in the Commonwealth so long as (i) the Department finds that the requirements for certification in such other state are substantially equivalent to those of the Commonwealth and (ii) holders of certificates issued by the Department are permitted to perform similar tasks in such state, and obtain similar certification from such state if required, upon presentation of the certificate issued by the Department and without additional testing, training, or other requirements not directly related to program administration.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:24; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 50 provides: “That the Certification Requirements for Mineral Miners (4 VAC 25-35 et seq.) shall remain in full force and effect until updated regulations are adopted by the Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-1119.
Renewal of certificates.

The holder of any certificate issued by the Board of Mineral Mining Examiners or the Department, other than a general mineral miner certificate, may renew the certificate by successfully completing the examination for the renewal of such certificate. The Department shall establish requirements for renewal of a certificate in accordance with the procedure set forth in §

45.2-1115

. The Department shall notify a certificate holder at least 180 days prior to the expiration of the certificate. Any certificate requiring renewal that is not renewed by the fifth anniversary of its issuance or of a previous renewal is invalid. As a condition to renewal, the holder shall provide the Department with all administrative information reasonably required and pay the examination fee as provided in §

45.2-1117

.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:25; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 50 provides: “That the Certification Requirements for Mineral Miners (4 VAC 25-35 et seq.) shall remain in full force and effect until updated regulations are adopted by the Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-1120.
Revocation of certificates.

The Department may revoke any certificate upon finding that (i) the holder has (a) been intoxicated while on duty; (b) neglected his duties; (c) violated any provision of the Act or any other mineral mining law of the Commonwealth, including any regulation adopted by the Department; or (d) used any controlled substance without the prescription of a licensed physician or (ii) other sufficient cause exists.

The Department may act to revoke any certificate upon the presentation of written charges by (i) the Director of the Division or any other employee of the Department; (ii) the operator of a mine at which such person is employed; (iii) an independent contractor working at such mine; or (iv) 10 persons working at the mine at which such person is employed or, if fewer than 10 persons are working at the mine, a majority of the workers at the mine.

Prior to revoking a certificate, the Department shall give due notice to the holder of the certificate and conduct a hearing. Any hearing shall be conducted in accordance with §

2.2-4020

unless the parties agree to informal proceedings. The hearing shall be conducted by a hearing officer as provided in §

2.2-4024

.

Any person aggrieved by a decision of the Department is entitled to judicial review of such decision. Appeals from such decisions shall be in accordance with Article 5 (§

2.2-4025

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:26; 1998, c. 695; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 50 provides: “That the Certification Requirements for Mineral Miners (4 VAC 25-35 et seq.) shall remain in full force and effect until updated regulations are adopted by the Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-1121.
Reexamination.

The holder of a certificate revoked pursuant to §

45.2-1120

is entitled to examination by the Department after a period of three months has elapsed from the date of revocation of the certificate if he can prove to the satisfaction of the Department that the cause for revocation of his certificate has ceased to exist.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:27; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 50 provides: “That the Certification Requirements for Mineral Miners (4 VAC 25-35 et seq.) shall remain in full force and effect until updated regulations are adopted by the Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-1122.
General mineral miner certification.

Every person beginning work in a mineral mine subsequent to January 1, 1997, shall hold a general mineral miner certificate issued by the Board of Mineral Mining Examiners or the Department. Any person who has worked in a mineral mine in the Commonwealth prior to that date may, but shall not be required to, hold a general mineral miner certificate.

Each applicant for a general mineral miner certificate shall prove to the Department that he has knowledge of first aid practices and has a general working knowledge of the provisions of the Act and applicable regulations pertaining to mineral mining health and safety.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:28; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 50 provides: “That the Certification Requirements for Mineral Miners (4 VAC 25-35 et seq.) shall remain in full force and effect until updated regulations are adopted by the Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-1123.
Foreman certification.

At any mineral mine where three or more persons work at the same time during any part of a 24-hour period, the licensed operator or independent contractor engaged in the extraction or processing of minerals shall employ a mine foreman. Only a person holding a foreman certificate in accordance with §

45.2-1114

shall be employed as a mine foreman. The holder of such a certificate shall present the certificate, or a copy thereof, to the operator where he is employed. Such operator shall file the certificate or its copy in the office at the mine and make it available for inspection by interested persons.

Every applicant for a foreman certificate shall have at least five years of experience at mineral mining, or other experience deemed appropriate by the Department, and shall demonstrate to the Department a thorough knowledge of the theory and practice of mineral mining by making a score of 85 percent or more on the written examination. In addition, each applicant shall pass an examination in first aid approved by the Department.

The certified mine foreman at each mine shall examine all active workings at the beginning of each shift. Any hazard or unsafe condition shall be corrected before any miner starts work in the affected area.

Any independent contractor working in a mineral mine who is engaged in an activity other than the extraction or processing of minerals and is working in a clearly demarcated area where (i) no mining-associated hazard exists and (ii) no other miner travels or works while engaged in an extraction or processing activity shall employ a competent person to examine the work area of the contractor at the beginning of each shift. Any hazard or unsafe condition shall be corrected prior to any person starting work in the affected area.

History.

1997, c. 390, § 45.1-161.292:29; 1998, c. 695; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 50 provides: “That the Certification Requirements for Mineral Miners (4 VAC 25-35 et seq.) shall remain in full force and effect until updated regulations are adopted by the Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”